California, session 20252026, AB1659.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 48647 of the Education Code is amended to read:48647. (a) Local educational agencies are strongly encouraged to enter into memoranda of understanding and create joint policies, systems, including data sharing systems, transition centers, and other joint structures that will allow for the immediate transfer of educational records, create uniform systems for calculating and awarding course credit, and allow for the immediate enrollment of pupils transferring from juvenile court schools.(b) As part of their existing responsibilities for coordinating education and services for youth in the juvenile justice system, the county office of education and county probation department shall have a joint transition planning policy that includes collaboration with relevant local educational agencies to improve communication regarding dates of release and the educational needs of pupils who have had contact with the juvenile justice system, to coordinate immediate school placement and enrollment, and to ensure that probation officers in the community have the information they need to support the return of pupils who are being transferred from juvenile court schools to public schools in their communities.(c) As part of the joint transition planning policy required under subdivision (b), the county office of education shall assign transition oversight responsibilities to existing county office of education personnel who will work in collaboration with the county probation department, as needed, and relevant local educational agencies to ensure all of the following:(1) The transfer of complete and accurate education records, including the pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable, within 72 hours of the pupil’s release from the juvenile detention facility.(2) Access to information about postsecondary academic and vocational opportunities, including college financial aid programs.(3) The implementation of the pupil’s transition plan, if one exists.(d) As part of the joint transition planning policy required under subdivision (b), the county office of education personnel assigned transition oversight responsibilities shall work in collaboration with the county probation department, as needed, and relevant local educational agencies to facilitate all of the following:(1) The immediate enrollment in an appropriate public school in their community when a pupil is transferred from the juvenile court school.(2) The acceptance, upon enrollment by the pupil in a public school, of course credits, including partial credits, for coursework completed in the juvenile court school, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.2.(3) The immediate placement in appropriate courses, based on coursework completed by the pupil, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51225.2.(4) The transfer of complete and accurate education records, including the pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable, when a pupil enters the juvenile court school.(e) As part of the joint transition planning policy required under subdivision (b), the school district in the juvenile court school pupil’s community shall assign transition liaison responsibilities to a staff member of the school district and who shall serve as the district point person for transition liaison responsibilities. The school district shall notify the county office of education and the county probation department of the staff member’s name and contact information. The staff member member, and other existing school district personnel as needed to serve the individual pupil, shall work in collaboration with the county office of education transition oversight personnel throughout the calendar year to ensure all of the following:(1) The timely transfer of complete and accurate education records, including the pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable, when a pupil enters the juvenile court school.(2) The immediate enrollment in an appropriate public school in the school district when a pupil is transferred from the juvenile court school.(3) The acceptance, upon enrollment by the pupil in a public school, of course credits, including partial credits, for coursework completed in the juvenile court school, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.2.(4) The immediate placement in appropriate courses, based on coursework completed by the pupil, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51225.2.(f) Each pupil detained for more than 20 consecutive schooldays shall have an individualized transition plan developed by the county office of education in collaboration with the county probation department, as needed. The individualized transition plan shall be developed before the pupil’s release and reviewed and revised as needed, and shall address, but not be limited to, both of the following:(1) The academic, behavioral, social-emotional, and career needs of the pupil.(2) The identification and engagement of programs, including higher education programs, services, and individuals to support a pupil’s successful transition into and out of the juvenile detention facility.(g) Each pupil detained for more than 20 consecutive schooldays shall have all of the following accessible to the holder of the educational rights for that pupil upon the pupil’s release from the juvenile detention facility:(1) School transcripts.(2) The pupil’s individualized learning plan, if applicable. For purposes of this section, an individualized learning plan is a plan developed collaboratively by a pupil and school personnel that identifies academic and career goals and how the pupil will progress toward meeting those goals.(3) The pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), if applicable.(4) The pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable.(5) Any academic and vocational assessments.(6) An analysis of credits completed and needed.(7) Any certificates or diplomas earned by the pupil.(h) For each pupil detained for 20 consecutive schooldays or fewer, a copy of the pupil’s individualized learning plan, if one exists, shall be made available by the county office of education to the pupil and the pupil’s school district						transition liaison staff member point person for transition liaison responsibilities upon the pupil’s release, if possible.(i) The county office of education, in collaboration, as needed, with the county probation department and relevant local educational agencies, shall establish procedures for the timely, accurate, complete, and confidential transfer of educational records in compliance with state and federal law.(j) Notwithstanding any other law, this section applies to juvenile court schools that are operated by, or as, charter schools. As used in this section, “county office of education” includes a charter school that serves juvenile court school pupils.SEC. 2. Section 49069.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:49069.5. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The mobility of pupils in foster care often disrupts their educational experience.(2) Efficient transfer procedures and transfer of pupil records are critical factors in the swift placement of foster children in educational settings.(3) Pupils who have had contact with the juvenile justice system are often denied credit or partial credit earned during enrollment in juvenile court schools. Delays in school enrollment and loss of earned credit can result in improper class or school placement, denial of special education services, and school dropout.(b) The proper and timely transfer between schools of pupils in foster care is the responsibility of both the local educational agency, including the county office of education for pupils in foster care who are enrolled in juvenile court schools, and the county placing agency, which includes the county probation department.(c) As soon as the county placing agency or county office of education becomes aware of the need to transfer a pupil in foster care out of the pupil’s current school, the county placing agency or county office of education shall contact the appropriate person at the local educational agency of the pupil. The county placing agency shall notify the local educational agency of the date that the pupil will be leaving the school and request that the pupil be transferred out.(d) Upon receiving a transfer request from a county placing agency or notification of enrollment from the new local educational agency, the local educational agency receiving the transfer request or notification shall, within two business days, transfer the pupil out of school and deliver the educational information and records of the pupil to the next educational placement.(e) As part of the transfer process described under subdivisions (c) and (d), the local educational agency shall compile the complete educational record of the pupil, including a determination of days of enrollment or seat time, or both if applicable, an official transcript that meets the requirements of Section 51225.2, including full and partial credits earned, or any measure of full or partial coursework being satisfactorily completed, as defined in Section 51225.2, including a determination of the days of enrollment or seat time, current classes and grades, immunization and other records, and, if applicable, a copy of the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).(f) The local educational agency shall assign the duties listed in this section to a person who is competent to handle the transfer procedure and who is aware of the specific educational recordkeeping needs of homeless, foster, and other transient children who transfer between schools.(g) The local educational agency shall ensure that, if the pupil in foster care is absent from school due to a decision to change the placement of a pupil made by a court or placing agency, the grades and credits of the pupil will be calculated as of the date the pupil left school and no lowering of grades will occur as a result of the absence of the pupil under these circumstances.(h) The local educational agency shall ensure that, if the pupil in foster care is absent from school due to a verified court appearance or related court ordered activity, no lowering of the pupil’s grades will occur as a result of the absence of the pupil under these circumstances.(i) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “County placing agency” means a county social services department or county probation department.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, a charter school participating as a member of a special education local plan area, or a special education local plan area.(3) “Pupil in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster child,” as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.SEC. 3. Section 51225.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:51225.2. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Former juvenile court school pupil” means a pupil who, upon completion of the pupil’s second year of high school, transfers to a school district or charter school, excluding a school district operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, from a juvenile court school.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(3) “Newcomer pupil” has the same meaning as “immigrant children and youth,” as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.(4) “Partial coursework satisfactorily completed” includes any portion of an individual course, even if the pupil did not complete the entire course.(5) “Pupil in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster child,” as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.(6) “Pupil who is a child of a military family” means a pupil who meets the definition of “children of military families” under Section 49701.(7) “Pupil who is a homeless child or youth” means a pupil who meets the definition of “homeless children and youths” in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.(8) “Pupil who is a migratory child” means a pupil who meets the definition of “currently migratory child” under subdivision (a) of Section 54441.(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall issue, and the new local educational agency shall accept, full or partial credit for all full or partial coursework satisfactorily completed by a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil, while attending a public school, a juvenile court school, a charter school, a school in a country other than the United States, or a nonpublic, nonsectarian school.(2) The transferring local educational agency shall, within 20 school days from the date of the pupil’s transfer, pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 49069.5, issue the full and partial credits on an official transcript for the pupil and shall ensure the transcript includes all of the following:(A) All full and partial credits and grades earned based on any measure of full or partial coursework being satisfactorily completed, including a determination of the days of enrollment or seat time, or both, if applicable, at a school of that local educational agency or a prior local educational agency, or any other public school, juvenile court school, charter school, school in a country other than the United States, or nonpublic, nonsectarian school.(B) The credits and grades for each school and local educational agency listed separately so it is clear where they were earned.(C) A complete record of the pupil’s seat time, including both period attendance and days of enrollment.(3)Partial credits for one course shall not equal more than the number of credits the pupil would have received for completing the whole course in one location. (4)(3) The new local educational agency shall transfer the credits and grades onto an official transcript of the new local educational agency for the pupil in the same manner as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) and pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (c).(5)(4) If the new school or new local educational agency has knowledge that the transcript from the transferring local educational agency may not include certain credits or grades for the pupil, it shall contact the prior local educational agency within two business days to request that the prior local educational agency issue full or partial credits pursuant to this paragraph. The prior local educational agency shall issue appropriate credits and provide all academic and other records to the new local educational agency within two business days of the request.(6)(5) For purposes of coursework completed by a pupil who is a child of a military family, “public school” includes schools operated by the United States Department of Defense.(c) (1) The credits accepted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be applied for enrollment purposes as specified in subdivision (d) to the same or equivalent course, if applicable, as the coursework completed in the prior public school, juvenile court school, charter school, school in a country other than the United States, or nonpublic, nonsectarian school.(2) For purposes of the official transcript, the credits accepted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be added to the credits earned from the same or equivalent course for purposes of calculating the total credits earned for the course but shall separately identify the school and local educational agency in which the credits were earned.(d) A local educational agency shall not require a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil to retake a course if the pupil has satisfactorily completed the entire course in a public school, a juvenile court school, a charter school, a school in a country other than the United States, or a nonpublic, nonsectarian school. If the pupil did not complete the entire course, the local educational agency shall not require the pupil to retake the portion of the course the pupil completed unless the local educational agency, in consultation with the holder of educational rights for the pupil, finds that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the requirements in time to graduate from high school. When partial credit is awarded in a particular course, the pupil in foster care, the pupil who is a homeless child or youth, the former juvenile court school pupil, the pupil who is a child of a military family, the pupil who is a migratory child, or the newcomer pupil shall be enrolled in the same or equivalent course, if applicable, so that the pupil may continue and complete the entire course.(e) A pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil shall not be prevented from retaking or taking a course to meet the eligibility requirements for admission to the California State University or the University of California.(f) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________